Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB547.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 131.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department [of Revenue ]shall exercise all administrative functions of the state
in relation to:
(a) The state revenue and tax laws;
(b) The publishing of administrative writings, tax forms, and instructions to those
tax forms on its official website;
(c) The licensing and registering of motor vehicles;
(d) The equalization of tax assessments;
(e) The assessment of public utilities and public service corporations for taxes;
(f) The assessment of franchises;
(g) The supervision of tax collections; and
(h) The enforcement of revenue and tax laws, either directly or through
supervision of tax administration activity in other departments to which the
department may commit administration of certain taxes.
(2) The department shall have all the powers and duties with reference to assessment or
equalization of the assessment of property heretofore exercised or performed by any
state board or commission.
(3) The department shall have all the powers and duties necessary to consider and settle
tax cases under KRS 131.110 and refund claims made under KRS 134.580. The
department is encouraged to settle controversies on a fair and equitable basis and
shall be authorized to settle tax controversies based on the hazards of litigation
applicable to them.
(4) The department shall have all the powers and duties necessary to collect any debts
owed to the Commonwealth, or any local government of the Commonwealth, that
are referred to the department by an organizational unit or administrative body in
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 8/1/2025 12:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 93
the executive branch of state government, as defined in KRS 12.010, the Court of
Justice in the judicial branch of state government, and any local government, under
KRS 45.237 and 45.241.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 8/1/2025 12:24 PM Jacketed